apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="probj_dem__prn">
      <e>
        <i/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>me</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>you</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>him</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>her</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>it</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>us</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>them</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>this</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>these</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>that</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>those</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pos_as_probj_dem_sg__prn">
      <e>
        <i/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>my</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>your</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>his</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>her</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>its</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>this</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>that</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pos_as_probj_dem_pl__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>our</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e i="yes" c="In the context this is intended, p2.pl is clear, but needs a rule change">
        <p>
          <l><b/>our</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>their</l>
          <r><j/>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>these</l>
          <r><j/>this<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>those</l>
          <r><j/>that<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ouml">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ö</l>
	  <r>ö</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>oe</l>
	  <r>ö</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="uuml">
      <e>
	<p>
	  <l>ü</l>
	  <r>ü</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ue</l>
	  <r>ü</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 
   <!-- dialects -->
    <pardef n="o_ou">
      <e c="en_GB, en_CA, en_ZA, en_IE" r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ou</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>o</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_GB" r="RL">
	<p>
	  <l>ou</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>o</l>
	  <r>ou</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="z_s">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE" r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <i>s</i>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_US" r="RL">
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>s</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e alt="en_GB" r="RL">
        <i>s</i>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_ae">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE, en_CA" r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ae</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>ae</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>ae</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="l_ll">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE, en_CA" r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>ll</l>
	  <r>ll</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>l</l>
	  <r>ll</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>ll</l>
	  <r>ll</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>l</l>
	  <r>ll</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_oe">
      <e c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE, en_CA" r="LR">
	<p>
	  <l>oe</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>oe</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>e</l>
	  <r>oe</r>
	</p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="organi/ze__vblex">
      <e r="LR" c="en_GB, en_ZA, en_IE">
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
	<par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="en_US, en_CA">
	<p>
	  <l>z</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      <par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_GB">
	<p>
	  <l>s</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
	<par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
      <e r="RL" alt="en_US">
	<p>
	  <l>z</l>
	  <r>s</r>
	</p>
      <par n="liv/e__vblex"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

<e lm="rack [one's] brain" c="singular possessor"><i>rack</i><par n="approach__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="pos_as_probj_dem_sg__prn"/><p><l><b/>brain</l><r><g><b/>brain</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="rack [one's] brain" c="plural possessor"><i>rack</i><par n="approach__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="pos_as_probj_dem_pl__prn"/><p><l><b/>brains</l><r><g><b/>brain</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Jürgen"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Tönis"><i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Pöttering"><i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="fill up" a="prompsit2cdl"><i>fill</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e>      <i>D</i><par n="ouml"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaemic"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>mic</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="anaesthesia"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesia</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="diarrhea"><i>diarrh</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>a</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="esophagus"><par n="e_oe"/><i>sophagus</i><par n="access__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="favouritism"><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>ritism</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="feces"><i>f</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ces</i><par n="alms__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="foetus"><i>f</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>tus</i><par n="access__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="apnoea"><i>apn</i><par n="e_oe"/><i>a</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="palaeontologist"><i>pal</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>ontologist</i><par n="house__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="organisational"><i>organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ational</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="favourite"><i>fav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rite</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="marvellous"><i>marve</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ous</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="vaporise"><i>vapori</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="wall in"><i>wall</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>in</l><r><g><b/>in</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="internalize"><i>internali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="prioritize"><i>prioriti</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="send back"><i>sen</i><par n="ben/d__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="trace back"><i>trac</i><par n="liv/e__vblex" sa="sep"/>      <par n="probj_dem__prn"/>      <p>        <l><b/>back</l><r><g><b/>back</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Jürgen"><i>J</i><par n="uuml"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Tönis"><i>T</i><par n="ouml"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="Pöttering"><i>P</i><par n="ouml"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/>     </e>
    <e lm="anesthesiology"><i>an</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>sthesiolog</i><par n="bab/y__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="behaviourism"><i>behavi</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rism</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="esophagoscopy"><par n="e_oe"/><i>sophagoscop</i><par n="bab/y__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="standardize"><i>standardi</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="crystallise"><i>crysta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>i</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="encyclopaedia"><i>encyclop</i><par n="e_ae"/><i>dia</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="glamorous" a="greenbreen"><i>glam</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>rous</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="World Health Organisation" a="greenbreen"><i>World<b/>Health<b/>Organi</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ation</i><par n="Linux__np"/></e>
<e lm="turn into"><i>turn</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="metallize"><i>meta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>i</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="moralize"><i>morali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="flavor"><i>flav</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="accept__vblex" /></e>
    <e lm="colonizing"><i>coloni</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ing</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="populariser" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>populari</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saviour" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>savi</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="shake up" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>sh</i><par n="t/ake__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="travelling"><i>trave</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ing</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="travelling saleswoman"><i>trave</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ing<b/>saleswoman</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="personalised" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>personali</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/>    </e>
    <e lm="decentralize" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>decentrali</i><par n="organi/ze__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="depend on" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>depend</i><par n="accept__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>on</l><r><g><b/>on</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="installment" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>insta</i><par n="l_ll"/><i>ment</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="unauthorized" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>unauthori</i><par n="z_s"/><i>ed</i><par n="expensive__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="succour"><i>succ</i><par n="o_ou"/><i>r</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
    <e lm="womanizer"><i>womani</i><par n="z_s"/><i>er</i><par n="house__n"/></e>
